Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2005
Public Counsel; term; removal; vacancy; salary.

The Public Counsel shall serve for a term of six years, unless removed for cause as determined by a two-thirds vote of the members of the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, by a two-thirds vote of the members of the Legislative Council. If the office of Public Counsel becomes vacant for any reason, the deputy public counsel shall serve as acting public counsel until a successor Public Counsel is appointed. The Public Counsel shall receive such salary as is set by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 4, p. 2880;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,243;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 5.